Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB97.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 510 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A person is guilty of traveling into the Commonwealth to commit a sexual offense
when he or she knowingly travels into the Commonwealth with the intent to
violate KRS 510.040, 510.050, 510.060, 510.070, 510.080, 510.090, or 510.110,
KRS 529.100 where that offense involves commercial sexual activity, KRS
530.064(1)(a), or any felony offense in KRS Chapter 531.
(2) (a) No person shall be convicted of this offense and an offense specified in KRS
506.010, 506.030, 506.040, or 506.080 for a single course of conduct
intended to consummate in the commission of the same offense with the
same victim.
(b) This section is intended to be a separate offense from others listed in
subsection (1) of this section, and shall be punished in addition to a
violation of the offenses listed in subsection (1) of this section during the
same course of conduct.
(3) Traveling into the Commonwealth to commit a sexual offense is punishable at the
same felony classification level as the underlying offense regardless if the
underlying offense is committed.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/6/2025 4:03 PM Jacketed